North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 1. Time of Primaries and Elections.

§ 163-1.
Time of regular elections and primaries.

Unless otherwise provided by law, elections for the officers listed in the tabulation contained in this section shall be conducted in all election precincts of the territorial units specified in the column headed “Jurisdiction” on the dates indicated
in the column headed “Date of Election.” Unless otherwise provided by law, officers shall serve for the terms specified in the column headed “Term of Office.”

On Tuesday next after the first Monday in March preceding each general election to be held in November for the officers referred to in subsection (a) of this section, there shall be held in all election precincts within the territory for which the officers
are to be elected a primary election for the purpose of nominating candidates for each political party in the State for those offices.

On Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in the year 1968, and every four years thereafter, or on such days as the Congress of the United States shall direct, an election shall be held in all of the election precincts of the State for the election
of electors of President and Vice-President of the United States. The number of electors to be chosen shall be equal to the number of Senators and Representatives in Congress to which this State may be entitled. Presidential electors
shall not be nominated by primary election; instead, they shall be nominated in a State convention of each political party as defined in

G.S. 163-96

unless otherwise provided by the plan of organization of the political party; provided, that in the case of a candidate for President of the United States who has qualified to have his name printed on the general
election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate under

G.S. 163-122

, that candidate shall nominate presidential electors. One presidential elector shall be nominated from each congressional district and two from the state-at-large, and in addition, the State convention of each party
and the unaffiliated candidate shall each nominate first and second alternate electors who shall serve if their slate is elected as provided by

G.S. 163-209

and if there is a vacancy as provided by

G.S. 163-210

.

If primaries for the State Senate or State House of Representatives are temporarily moved from the date provided in subsection (b) of this section for any election year, all primaries shall be held on the same day.

tablenum=“=table3” align=“left”> =c1 Treasurer =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every four years thereafter =c4 Four years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Superintendent of Public Instruction
=c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every four years thereafter =c4 Four years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Attorney General =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first
Monday in November 1968 and every four years thereafter =c4 Four years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Commissioner of Agriculture =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every
four years thereafter =c4 Four years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Commissioner of Labor =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every four years thereafter =c4 Four years,
from first day of January next after election =c1 Commissioner of Insurance =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every four years thereafter =c4 Four years, from first day of January next after
election =c1 All other State officers whose terms last for four years =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every four years thereafter =c4 Four years, from first day of January next after election
=c1 All other State officers whose terms are not specified by law =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from first day of January next after election
=c1 State Senator =c2 Senatorial district =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 Member of State House of Representatives =c2 Representative district =c3 Tuesday
next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 Justices and Judges of the Appellate Division =c2 State =c3 Except as provided in Article 1A of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes,
at the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Eight years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Judges of the superior courts =c2 Superior
Court District =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Eight years, from first day of January after next election =c1 Judges of the district
courts =c2 District court district =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first day in January next after election
=c1 District Attorney =c2 District Attorney district =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from first day of January next
after election =c1 Members of House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States =c2 Congressional district, except as modified by

G.S. 163-104

=c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 United States Senators =c2 State =c3 At the regular election immediately preceding the termination of
each regular term =c4 Six years =c1 County commissioners =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Two years, from the first Monday
in December next after election =c1 Clerk of superior court =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first
Monday in December next after election =c1 Register of deeds =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first
Monday in December next after election =c1 Sheriff =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday
in December next after election =c1 Coroner =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of a regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December
next after election =c1 County treasurer (in counties in which elected) =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next
after election =c1 All other county officers to be elected by the people =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next
after election =te =c1 All other State officers whose terms are not specified by law =c2 State =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from first day of January
next after election =c1 State Senator =c2 Senatorial district =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 Member of State House of Representatives =c2 Representative
district =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 Justices and Judges of the Appellate Division =c2 State =c3 Except as provided in Article 1A of Chapter 7A of
the General Statutes, at the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Eight years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Judges of the superior
courts =c2 Superior Court District =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Eight years, from first day of January after next election =c1
Judges of the district courts =c2 District court district =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first day in January
next after election =c1 District Attorney =c2 District Attorney district =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from first
day of January next after election =c1 Members of House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States =c2 Congressional district, except as modified by

G.S. 163-104

=c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 United States Senators =c2 State =c3 At the regular election immediately preceding the termination of
each regular term =c4 Six years =c1 County commissioners =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Two years, from the first Monday
in December next after election =c1 Clerk of superior court =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first
Monday in December next after election =c1 Register of deeds =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first
Monday in December next after election =c1 Sheriff =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday
in December next after election =c1 Coroner =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of a regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December
next after election =c1 County treasurer (in counties in which elected) =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next
after election =c1 All other county officers to be elected by the people =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next
after election =te =c1 Judges of the district courts =c2 District court district =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from
the first day in January next after election =c1 District Attorney =c2 District Attorney district =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4
Four years, from first day of January next after election =c1 Members of House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States =c2 Congressional district, except as modified by G.S. 163-104 =c3 Tuesday next after the
first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years =c1 United States Senators =c2 State =c3 At the regular election immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Six years =c1 County
commissioners =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 Clerk
of superior court =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1
Register of deeds =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1
Sheriff =c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 Coroner
=c2 County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of a regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 County treasurer (in
counties in which elected) =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 All other county officers
to be elected by the people =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next after election =te =c1 Register of deeds =c2
County =c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 Sheriff =c2 County
=c3 At the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of each regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 Coroner =c2 County =c3 At
the regular election for members of the General Assembly immediately preceding the termination of a regular term =c4 Four years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 County treasurer (in counties in which
elected) =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next after election =c1 All other county officers to be elected by
the people =c2 County =c3 Tuesday next after the first Monday in November 1968 and every two years thereafter =c4 Two years, from the first Monday in December next after election =te

History.
Const., art. 4, s. 24; 1901, c. 89, ss. 1-4, 73, 74, 77; Rev., ss. 4293, 4294, 4296-4299; 1915, c. 101, s. 1; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 5914, 5915, 5917-5920, 6018; 1935, c. 362; 1939, c. 196; 1943, c. 134, s. 4; 1947, c.
505, s. 1; 1951, c. 1009, s. 2; 1953, c. 1191, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; cc. 1264, 1271; 1969, c. 44, s. 80; 1971, c. 170; 1973, c. 793, s. 93; 1977, c. 265, s. 1; c. 661, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 782, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess.,
1994), c. 738, s. 2; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 2; 2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., s. 6; 2004-127, s. 12; 2005-425, s. 3.2; 2015-66, s. 3; 2017-3, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-21, s. 1; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 163-118 to 163-147.

Session Laws 1945, c. 894, repealed former Article 19, relating to primaries, insofar as its provisions applied to the nomination of Democratic candidates for the General Assembly and county offices in Mitchell County.

Session Laws 1957, c. 826, as amended by Session Laws 1959, c. 621, s. 2, provided that the former Article should not apply to nominations of Democratic candidates for county offices and members of the House of Representatives in Cherokee County, but
that such candidates should be nominated by convention of the Democratic Party.

Session Laws 1961, c. 484, provided that the former Article should not apply to nominations of Republican candidates for county offices and members of the General Assembly in Cherokee County, but that such candidates should be nominated by convention
of the Republican Party.

Session Laws 1953, c. 1069, as amended by Session Laws 1959, c. 238, made the former Article applicable to Watauga County.

Session Laws 1955, c. 439, to the extent provided, made the former Article applicable to Yancey County.

Session Laws 1955, c. 442, made the former Article applicable to the Counties of Avery, Madison, Mitchell and Yancey for the purpose of nominating Democratic candidates for the state Senate.

Local Modification to Former

G.S. 163-129

.

Avery: 1933, c. 327; 1935, c. 141; 1937, c. 263; Stanly: 1945, c. 958.

Session Laws 1971, c. 50, made the provisions of the primary laws as contained in this Chapter applicable to Yancey County, and repealed Session Laws 1955, cc. 439 and 442, insofar as they conflicted with the 1971 act.

Session Laws 1975, c. 246, provided that the provisions of the general primary laws of this Chapter should be applicable in Mitchell County for the purpose of nominating the candidates of the Republican Party for all county offices.

(As to this Chapter) Caswell: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1016, ss. 5, 12; (As to this Chapter) Cumberland: 1991, c. 445; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 810; Tyrell: 1995, c. 69, s. 1; (As to this Chapter) city of Albemarle: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 881,
s. 2; city of Clinton: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 886; town of Calabash: 1987, c. 468, s. 6; Grandfather Village: 1987, c. 549, s. 6.9; (As to this Chapter) Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781 (but
shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965); Vance County Board of Education: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 974, ss. 3, 4.

Cross References.

As to election of members of county boards of education, see

G.S. 115C-37

.

As to election of executive officers of the State government, see

G.S. 147-4

.

Recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification, in consultation with the State Ethics Commission, the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State, and the new Bipartisan
State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement.

Session Laws 2016-125, ss. 1 and 2, 4th Ex. Sess., similarly recodified Chapters 120C, 138A, and 163 in a new Chapter. That new Chapter was designated as Chapter 138B, and headings for new Chapter 138B, Subchapter I, and Article 1 were enacted, along
with new sections designated as G.S. 138B-1 through 138B-6. Due to a constitutional challenge to the provisions of Session Laws 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., the recodification was stayed and never went into effect. Session Laws 2017-6,
s. 2, repealed Part I of 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., among which were the recodifying provisions in ss. 1 and 2.

Session Laws 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), effective January 31, 2019, provides: “The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to re-recodify Chapter 163A of the General Statutes back into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C of the General Statutes. In preparing the re-recodified
chapters, the Revisor of Statutes shall revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Section 3 of S.L. 2017-6, except that after consultation with the appropriate agency staff, the Revisor may separate subsections of statutory
sections that existed in the former Chapters into new sections and, when necessary to organize relevant law into its proper place in the re-recodified chapters, may rearrange sentences that appeared within those subsections. The Revisor
shall also incorporate into the re-recodified chapters all amendments to Chapters 163, 163A, 138A, and 120C that became effective on or after April 25, 2017, other than those made by S.L. 2017-6 or by Part VIII of S.L. 2018-2.”

Session Laws 2018-146, s. 6.1, provides: “Consistent with this act, when re-recodifying as directed under this act, the Revisor is authorized to change all references to the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement to instead be references
to the State Board of Elections, State Ethics Commission, or Secretary of State, as appropriate. The Revisor may modify statutory citations throughout the General Statutes, as appropriate, and may modify any references to statutory
divisions, such as ‘Chapter,’ ‘Subchapter,’ ‘Article,’ ‘Part,’ ‘section,’ and ‘subsection’; adjust the order of lists of multiple statutes to maintain statutory order; correct terms and conform names and titles changed by this act;
eliminate duplicative references to the State Boards that result from the changes authorized by this section; and make conforming changes to catch lines and references to catch lines. The Revisor may also adjust subject and verb agreement
and the placement of conjunctions. The Revisor shall consult with the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement, the State Board of Elections, the State Ethics Commission, and the Secretary of State, as appropriate,
on this recodification.”

§ 163-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-460, s. 2, effective January 1, 2002.

§ 163-3.
Special elections.

Special elections shall be called as permitted by law and conducted in accordance with

G.S. 163-287

.

History.
2013-381, s. 10.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-4 through 163-7.

Reserved for future codification purposes.